Washington statutes.
RCW 36.92.010

Purpose.

The purpose of this chapter is to provide county officials of each county with a modern approach to the common problems encountered by said officers in accounting, recordkeeping, and problem solving, thereby effectuating economies in county government.

It is further the intent of this chapter that the constitutional autonomy of the various county officers be preserved while providing such officials with a centralized department to perform ministerial functions for them on the most modern and efficient machines available.

[ 1967 ex.s. c 103 s 2.]